District of Columbia statutes.
29-1005.11

Voting by patron members.

Except as otherwise provided by § 29-1005.12(a), each patron member shall have one vote. The organic rules may allocate voting power among patron members as provided in § 29-1005.12(a).

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 511 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.
This section is referenced in § 29-1001.09.